Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1715
Precious metal, defined.

Precious metal shall mean the following in either coin, bullion, or other form:

(1) Silver;

(2) Gold;

(3) Platinum;

(4) Palladium;

(5) Copper; and

(6) Such other items as the director may specify by rule, regulation, or order.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 15.